Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB676.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 75BFIRST RESPONDER RESILIENCE GRANTSSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. First Responder Resilience Grant ProgramC. First Responder Resilience Grant Program FundD. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONS123456789101112131415161718 Sec.75B01. Scope of chapter.75B02. Definitions.§ 75B01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to first responder resilience grants.§ 75B02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency."Evidence-based tool." As follows:(1) A service or program that is designed for a first responder to withstand, recover from and grow in the face of stressors, trauma and the changing demands resulting from the unique work of the first responder.(2) The term includes:(i) Peer mentoring.(ii) Training and assistance regarding emotional and mental health.(iii) Integrative medicine, physical relaxation and mindfulness techniques, including massage therapy, talk therapy, yoga and meditation.(iv) Suicide prevention.(v) Stress reduction techniques.(vi) Support services for the first responder and the family of the first responder."First responder." As defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5) and (7) of the definition of "first responder" under section 79C11 (relating to definitions)."First responder organization." An entity in this 20250HB0676PN0690 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth for which a first responder is employed or volunteers for service."Fund." The First Responder Resilience Grant Program Fund established under section 75B21 (relating to establishment of fund)."Mental health care." Any care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat or provide for mental health, including any medication program or therapeutic treatment."Mental health provider." A person that is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to administer or provide mental health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession."Program." The First Responder Resilience Grant Program established under section 75B11 (relating to establishment of program)."Resilience coach." An individual who:(1) Is a mental health provider.(2) Supports the mental health and wellness of the first responders within a first responder organization by providing the first responders with evidence-based tools to withstand, recover and grow in the face of stressors, trauma and the changing demands of the unique work of first responders.SUBCHAPTER BFIRST RESPONDER RESILIENCE GRANT PROGRAMSec.75B11. Establishment of program.75B12. Purpose of program.75B13. Application form.75B14. Review and determination.20250HB0676PN0690 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 75B15. Distribution of grants.§ 75B11. Establishment of program.The First Responder Resilience Grant Program is established within the agency, which shall implement and administer the program in accordance with this chapter.§ 75B12. Purpose of program.The purpose of the program is to award grants to first responder organizations, on a competitive basis, to defray personnel costs, including salaries and overtime, involved in embedding resilience coaches into first responder organizations.§ 75B13. Application form.(a) Development.--The agency shall develop an application form for first responder organizations to apply for grants under the program.(b) Contents.--The application form for a grant under the program must include at least the following information:(1) The name, address and contact information of the first responder organization requesting the grant.(2) The amount of the requested grant.(3) The proposed use for the requested grant.(4) Any other information that the agency deems necessary and appropriate.§ 75B14. Review and determination.(a) Process generally.--The agency shall prescribe the process to submit and review completed application forms in accordance with this section.(b) Acceptance of completed application forms.--(1) Beginning no later than 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the agency shall begin accepting and processing applications for grants under the program.20250HB0676PN0690 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) For all subsequent years, the agency shall establish an application period during which applications for grants under the program are accepted.(c) Review.--After receiving a completed application for a grant under the program from a first responder organization, the agency shall review the application and determine:(1) Whether to award the grant to the first responder organization, in whole or in part.(2) The amount of any grant awarded, along with any conditions for or restrictions on the use of the grant.(d) Consideration and preference.--(1) Grants under the program shall be awarded on a competitive basis.(2) In awarding grants under the program, the agency shall give preference to first responder organizations whose application demonstrates the greatest likelihood to fulfill the purposes of the program.(e) Time periods.--(1) The agency shall approve or deny an application under the program no later than 60 days after the receipt of the application.(2) If the agency fails to approve or deny the application in accordance with paragraph (1), the application shall be deemed denied.(f) Notice.--The agency shall provide notice of the determination under subsection (c), including:(1) In the case of approval of the application, the amount of the grant and any conditions for or restrictions on the use of the grant.(2) In the case of a full or partial disapproval of the 20250HB0676PN0690 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application, the reasons for the full or partial disapproval.§ 75B15. Distribution of grants.(a) Amount.--The agency may establish limits on the amount of a grant for a first responder organization.(b) First-come, first-served basis.--The agency shall distribute grants under the program on a first-come, first-served basis determined by the agency and until all the money in the fund is exhausted.SUBCHAPTER CFIRST RESPONDER RESILIENCE GRANT PROGRAM FUNDSec.75B21. Establishment of fund.75B22. Operation of fund.75B23. Fund sources.§ 75B21. Establishment of fund.The First Responder Resilience Grant Program Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund in the State Treasury to carry out the purposes of the program.§ 75B22. Operation of fund. (a) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and interest and other earnings on the money in the fund are appropriated to the agency on a continuing basis to award grants under the program.(b) End of fiscal year.--Any money remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year, including interest and other earnings, shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.§ 75B23. Fund sources.The agency may solicit and accept funding for the program, including money appropriated by the General Assembly, Federal 20250HB0676PN0690 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source, which shall be deposited into the fund.SUBCHAPTER DMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.75B31. Educational materials.75B32. Posting of information.75B33. Reports.75B34. Guidelines, rules and regulations.§ 75B31. Educational materials.The agency shall ensure the development of educational materials about best practices regarding mental health care and evidence-based tools.§ 75B32. Posting of information.The agency shall post the following on its publicly accessible Internet website:(1) Information regarding the availability of grants under the program.(2) The application form under section 75B13 (relating to application form).(3) Recipients of grants under the program.(4) The educational materials described under section 75B31 (relating to educational materials).§ 75B33. Reports.(a) Annual reports required.--No later than the first September 1 that is at least one year after the effective date of this subsection, and each September 1 thereafter, the agency shall issue an annual report detailing the operation of the program and fund during the preceding year.(b) Contents.--Each annual report under this section must 20250HB0676PN0690 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 include the following:(1) The number of first responder organizations that sought a grant under the program, including the total amount of the grants sought under the program.(2) The number of first responder organizations that received a grant under the program, including the amount of the grant that each first responder organization received under the program.(3) The number of first responder organizations that were denied, in whole or in part, a grant under the program, including the reasons for the full or partial denial.(4) The money remaining in the fund.(5) Any other information deemed necessary by the agency.(c) Transmittal.--Each annual report under this section shall be transmitted to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Posting.--The agency shall post each annual report under this section on the publicly accessible Internet website of the agency.§ 75B34. Guidelines, rules and regulations.The agency shall adopt or promulgate any guideline, rule or regulation necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0676PN0690 - 8 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829